Utah statutes.
41-1a-701.   Transfer by owner -- Removal of plates.

(1)  If the owner of a registered vehicle transfers his title or interest to the vehicle the registration of the vehicle expires. The owner shall remove the license plates from the transferred vehicle.

(2)  Within 20 days from the date of transfer the owner shall forward the plates to the division to be destroyed or may have the plates and the registration number assigned to another vehicle, subject to the rules of the division.



Amended by Chapter 222, 1993 General Session

